Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 HF 2246 (5) 91 ss/ko/md H.F. 2246 Section 1. Section 256.146, subsection 1, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (2) Establish issuance and renewal requirements, provided 3 that a continuing education requirement may be completed by 4 electronic means, continuing education requirements shall 5 relate directly to the practice of the licensed profession, 6 except as otherwise required by law, and there shall be no 7 renewal requirement for a practitioner who has been employed 8 as a practitioner for at least ten years and who possesses a 9 masterâs or doctoral degree, unless the practitioner holds an 10 evaluator approval endorsement, which must be renewed at least 11 once every ten years. 12 Sec. 2. Section 272C.2, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 13 by adding the following new paragraph: 14 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. Not include any requirements that are not 15 directly related to the practice of the licensed profession, 16 except as otherwise required by law. 17 Sec. 3. ATTORNEY LICENSING ââ COURT RULES. 18 1. The supreme court shall adopt or amend Iowa court rules 19 for continuing education requirements for licensed attorneys, 20 such that the rules shall not include any requirements that 21 are not directly related to the practice of law, except as 22 otherwise required by law. 23 2. The supreme court shall adopt or amend Iowa court rules 24 such that there is no requirement that the law school the 25 individual graduated from is a law school accredited by the 26 American bar association council for legal education prior to 27 sitting for the bar exam in this state. 28 -1- HF 2246 (5) 91 ss/ko/md 1/ 1